Utah statutes.
13-35-107.   Administrative proceedings -- Request for agency action.

(1) (a)  A person may commence an adjudicative proceeding in accordance with this chapter and with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, to:

(i)  remedy a violation of this chapter;

(ii)  obtain approval of an act regulated by this chapter; or

(iii)  obtain any determination that this chapter specifically authorizes that person to request.

(b)  A person shall commence an adjudicative proceeding by filing a request for agency action in accordance with Section 63G-4-201.

(2)  After receipt of the advisory board's recommendation, the executive director shall apportion in a fair and equitable manner between the parties any costs of the adjudicative proceeding, including reasonable attorney fees.

